dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="j/ura__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ury</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ure</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uru</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ure</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ura</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urou</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ura</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úr</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urám</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ury</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urách</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ury</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>urami</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ury</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of j/ura__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ur</l>
        <r>ura<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- j/ura__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="/ťapa__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapy</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťape</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapu</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťape</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapa</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapou</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapa</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>tiap</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapám</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapy</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapách</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapy</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapami</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťapy</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of /ťapa__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ťap</l>
        <r>ťapa<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- /ťapa__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="k/aša__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aše</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aši</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ašu</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aši</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aša</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ašou</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aša</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áš</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aší</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ašiam</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aše</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ašiach</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aše</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ašami</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aše</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of k/aša__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aš</l>
        <r>aša<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- k/aša__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="BASE__Gambia"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="Dáš/a__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>am</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ach</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of Dáš/a__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- Dáš/a__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="BASE__Gambia"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="ťapa"><i></i><par n="/ťapa__n"/></e>
    <e lm="Dáša"><i>Dáš</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dieža"><i>diež</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="jura"><i>j</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ježura"><i>jež</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kaša"><i>k</i><par n="k/aša__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kengura"><i>keng</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mura"><i>m</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nadpráca"><i>nadprác</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pláca"><i>plác</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="práca"><i>prác</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ríša"><i>ríš</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sakura"><i>sak</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="skrýša"><i>skrýš</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spolupráca"><i>spoluprác</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="svieca"><i>sviec</i><par n="Dáš/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tambura"><i>tamb</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vzbura"><i>vzb</i><par n="j/ura__n"/></e>
